Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-223] Discretionary powers of the
commissioner. The commissioner may upon written request and after an
administrative hearing, issue an order to modify or suspend a specific
provision or provisions of this part with respect to a specific long-term care
insurance policy or certificate upon a written finding that:

(1) The modification or suspension would be in the
best interest of the insureds;

(2) The purposes to be achieved could not be
effectively or efficiently achieved without the modification or suspension; and

(3) One of the following conditions have been met:

(A) The modification or suspension is
necessary to the development of an innovative and reasonable approach for
insuring long-term care;

(B) The policy or certificate is to be issued
to residents of a life care or continuing care retirement community or some
other residential community for the elderly and the modification or suspension
is reasonably related to the special needs or nature of the community; or

(C) The modification or suspension is
necessary to permit long-term care insurance to be sold as part of, or in
conjunction with, another insurance product. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next